Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:Artificial intelligence may supplement or enhance instruction. Artificial intelligence may not replace certificated instructional staff or paraeducators.--- END ---